Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.210

Washington college grant program—Caseload forecast.

The caseload forecast council shall estimate the anticipated caseload of the Washington college grant program and submit the caseload forecast as specified in RCW 43.88C.020.

[ 2019 c 406 s 23.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.79.195.

Findings—Short title—2019 c 406: See notes following RCW 28B.92.200.

Findings—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28B.94.020.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 28C.30.050.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 406: See note following RCW 43.216.135.